District of Columbia statutes.
38-1806.06

Report.

The private, nonprofit corporation shall prepare and submit to the appropriate congressional committees on a quarterly basis, or, with respect to fiscal year 1997, on a semiannual basis, a report which shall contain:

(1)

The activities the corporation has carried out, including the duties of the corporation described in § 38-1806.04, for the 3-month period ending on the date of the submission of the report, or, with respect to fiscal year 1997, the 6-month period ending on the date of the submission of the report;

(2)

An assessment of the use of funds or other resources donated to the corporation;

(3)

The results of the assessment carried out under § 38-1806.04(b)(3); and

(4)

A description of the goals and priorities of the corporation for the 3-month period beginning on the date of the submission of the report, or, with respect to fiscal year 1997, the 6-month period beginning on the date of the submission of the report.

History

Apr. 26, 1996, 110 Stat. 1321 [268], Pub. L. 104-134, § 2606

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-2853.66.